Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1284.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1102. Sentence for murder, murder of unborn child and murder of law enforcement officer.* * *(c) Attempt, solicitation and conspiracy.--(1) Notwithstanding section 1103(1) (relating to sentence of imprisonment for felony), a person who has been convicted of attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit murder[,] or murder of an unborn child [or murder of a law enforcement officer] where serious bodily injury results may 1234567891011121314151617181920 be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years. Where serious bodily injury does not result, the person may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 20 years.(2) Notwithstanding section 1103(1) or any other provision of law, a person convicted of criminal attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder of a law enforcement officer under section 2507(a) (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer) where serious bodily injury results may be sentenced up to a maximum term of life imprisonment. Where serious bodily injury does not result, the person may be sentenced to a term of imprisonment which shall be fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.* * *Section 2. Section 9719.1(a) and (d) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 9719.1. Sentences for offenses committed against law enforcement officer.(a) Mandatory sentence.--A person convicted of any of the following [offense] offenses shall be sentenced to a mandatory term of imprisonment as follows:Criminal attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder of a law enforcement officer under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507(a) (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer) where serious bodily injury results - not less than 20 years.18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1(a)(1) (relating to assault of law enforcement officer) - not less than 20 years.* * *20260SB1284PN1580 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Law enforcement officer." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "peace officer" is given under 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions)."Serious bodily injury." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1284PN1580 - 3 - 123456789